California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(2) Secure rights to the sites identified, including, but not limited to, fee simple acquisition, leaseholds, or options.

(3) Conduct any studies that may be necessary to construct and operate generation facilities at the site, including, but not limited to, environmental, engineering, or feasibility studies.

(4) Conduct, in coordination with the Energy Commission, all applicable public and community involvement processes.

(5) Apply for permits, licenses, or other local, state, or federal approvals, including, but not limited to, compliance with the applicable procedures of the Energy Commission.

(b) The authority may request proposals from qualified participating parties to purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire sites for the purpose of developing generation facilities that will provide the lowest cost power to consumers over the life of the facilities, consistent with Section 3351.

(c) The authority shall comply with all applicable air quality laws and regulations and the Warren-Alquist State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Act (Division 15 (commencing with Section 25000) of the Public Resources Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Renewable Energy and Conservation [3365. - 3367.5.]

3365.

The authority may provide loans, utilizing up to one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) of the bond authority, under terms and conditions approved by the authority, to any participating party, which shall use that loan to make loans available to California consumers and businesses for all of the following purposes:

(a) The purchase of consumer appliances and home improvements with electric and gas energy efficiency or renewable energy characteristics, as approved by the Energy Commission, the commission, or a participating local publicly owned electric utility, as applicable.

(b) The purchase or lease of business equipment and facility improvements with electric and gas energy efficiency or renewable energy characteristics, as approved by the Energy Commission, the commission, or a participating local publicly owned electric utility, as applicable.

(c) Any other electric or natural gas energy conservation program or any program for the use of renewable energy resources, as approved by the Energy Commission, the commission, or a participating local publicly owned electric utility, as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3366.

As a condition of receipt of a loan pursuant to Section 3365, a participating party shall be required to conduct a comprehensive marketing program that makes consumers aware of the availability of these financial assistance programs, and to provide appropriate security for repayment of the loan, including, without limitation, a pledge to the authority of consumer and business loan repayments collected through utility bills, as applicable and a certification that the duration of a loan will not exceed the useful life of a purchase.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3367.

The authority shall require that any equipment or improvement financed by a loan made pursuant to this article shall be certified as having been installed or completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3367.5.

The authority may require that a participating party utilize a consumer protection plan for screening qualified contractors who serve consumers under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Energy Resource Investment Plan [3369. - 3369.]

3369.

(a) Within 180 days of the effective date of this division, the authority, in consultation with the Energy Commission and the Independent System Operator, shall develop an Energy Resource Investment Plan and submit that plan to the Governor and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairs of the policy committees with jurisdiction over energy policy in the State of California.

(b) The Energy Resource Investment Plan shall take into account California’s anticipated energy service needs for both electricity and natural gas over the next decade. The plan shall address issues regarding adequacy of supply, storage, reliability of service, grid congestion, and environmental quality. In developing the investment plan, the authority shall compare the costs of various energy resources, including a comparison of the costs and benefits of demand reduction strategies with the costs and benefits of additional generation supply. The plan shall acknowledge the potential volatility of fossil fuel prices and the value of resources that avoid that price risk.

(c) The plan shall outline a strategy for cost-effective energy resource investments, using the financing powers provided to the authority by this division. The plan may recommend changes to the specific expenditure authority granted in this division in order to carry out the investment strategy contained in the plan.

(d) The plan shall be developed with input from interested parties at scheduled public hearings of the authority. The authority should adopt the plan by majority vote of the board at a public meeting. The authority shall update the plan on a regular basis as determined by the authority.

(e) All investments made by the authority under this division shall be consistent with the strategy outlined in the Energy Resource Investment Plan. Nothing in this section shall preclude the authority from exercising its powers prior to the adoption of the initial Energy Resource Investment Plan.

(f) The authority shall be the agency responsible for ensuring that the investment strategy outlined in the Energy Resource Investment Plan is implemented. To that end, the authority may, on its own or through a partnership with a participating party, make those investments necessary to ensure that the plan is implemented.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Agencies Relation to Other State Energy Oversight [3369.5. - 3369.5.]

3369.5.

Nothing in this division shall be construed to obviate the need to review the roles, functions, and duties of other state energy oversight agencies and, where appropriate, change or consolidate those roles, functions, and duties. To achieve that efficiency, the Governor may propose to the Legislature a Governmental Reorganization Plan, pursuant to Section 8523 of the Government Code and Section 6 of Article V of the Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. California Consumer Power and Conservation Financing Authority Fund [3370. - 3370.]

3370.

(a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury the California Consumer Power and Conservation Financing Authority Fund for expenditure by the authority for the purpose of implementing the objectives and provisions of this division. For the purposes of subdivision (e), or as necessary or convenient to the accomplishment of any other purpose of the authority, the authority may establish within the fund additional and separate accounts and subaccounts.

(b) The assets of the fund shall be available for the payment of the salaries and other expenses charged against it in accordance with this division.

(c) Except as provided under Section 3345, all moneys in the fund that are not General Fund moneys are continuously appropriated to the authority and may be used for any reasonable costs which may be incurred by the authority in the exercise of its powers under this division.

(d) The fund, on behalf of the authority, may borrow or receive moneys from the authority, or from any federal, state, or local agency or private entity, to create reserves in the fund as provided in this division and as authorized by the board.

(e) The authority may pledge any or all of the moneys in the fund (including in any account or subaccount) as security for payment of the principal of, and interest on, any particular issuance of bonds issued pursuant to this division.

(f) The authority, may, from time to time, direct the Treasurer to invest moneys in the fund that are not required for the authority’s current needs, including proceeds from the sale of any bonds, in any securities permitted by law as the authority shall designate. The authority also may direct the Treasurer to deposit moneys in interest-bearing accounts in state or national banks or other financial institutions having principal offices in this state. The authority may alternatively require the transfer of moneys in the fund to the Surplus Money Investment Fund for investment pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 16470) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Government Code. All interest or other increment resulting from an investment or deposit shall be deposited in the fund, notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code. Moneys in the fund shall not be subject to transfer to any other fund pursuant to any provision of Part 2 (commencing with Section 16300) of Division 4 of the Government Code, excepting the Surplus Money Investment Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Bonds [3380.1. - 3383.]

3380.1.

For purposes of this division, the authority may incur indebtedness and issue securities of any kind or class, at public or private sale by the Treasurer, and to renew the same,
 if all such indebtedness, howsoever evidenced, shall be payable solely from revenues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 49.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3380.2.

In connection with the issuance of bonds, in addition to the powers otherwise provided in this division, the authority may do all of the following:

(a) Issue, from time to time, bonds payable from and secured by a pledge of all or any part of the revenues in order to finance the activities authorized by this division, including, without limitation, an enterprise or multiple enterprises, a single project for a single participating party, a series of projects for a single participating party, a single project for several participating parties, or several projects for several participating parties, and to sell those bonds at public or private sale by the Treasurer, in the form and on those terms and conditions as the Treasurer, as agent for sale, shall approve.

(b) Pledge all or any part of the revenues to secure bonds and any repayment or reimbursement obligations of the authority to any provider of insurance or a guarantee of liquidity or credit facility entered into to provide for the payment or debt service on any bond.

(c) Employ and compensate bond counsel, financial consultants, underwriters, and other advisers determined necessary and appointed by the Treasurer in connection with the issuance and sale of any bond.

(d) Issue bonds to refund or purchase or otherwise acquire bonds on terms and conditions as the Treasurer, as agent for sale, shall approve.

(e) Perform all acts that relate to the function and purpose of the authority under this division, whether or not specifically designated in this
 chapter.

(f) Seek financial assistance from any entity eligible to access the California Transmission Accelerator Revolving Fund pursuant to Article 10.5 (commencing with Section 63049.71) of Chapter 2 of Division 1 of Title 6.7 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 50.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3381.

Bonds issued by the authority are legal investments for all trust funds, the funds of all insurance companies, banks, both commercial and savings, trust companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries, for state school funds, pension funds, and for any funds that may be invested in county, school, or municipal bonds. The bonds issued under this division are securities that may legally be deposited with, and received by, any state or municipal officer or agency or political subdivision of the state, including, without limitation, local agencies, schools, and pension funds, for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations of the state is now, or may hereafter be, authorized by law, including deposits to secure public funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3382.

The authority is authorized to obtain loans from the Pooled Money Investment Account pursuant to Sections 16312 and 16313 of the Government Code. These loans shall be subject to the terms negotiated with the Pooled Money Investment Board, including, but not limited to, a pledge of authority bond proceeds or revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3383.

Bonds issued under this division shall not be deemed to constitute a debt or liability of the state or of any political subdivision thereof, other than the authority, or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or of any political subdivision, other than the authority, but shall be payable solely from the funds herein provided therefor. All bonds issued under this division shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the following effect: “Neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State of California or any local agency is pledged to the payment of the principal of or interest on this bond.” The issuance of bonds under this division shall not directly or indirectly or contingently obligate the state or any political subdivision thereof to levy or to pledge any form of taxation whatever therefor or to make any appropriation for their payment. Nothing in this section shall prevent nor be construed to prevent the authority from pledging its full faith and credit to the payment of bonds or issue of bonds authorized pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1.7. GOLDEN STATE ENERGY ACT [3400. - 3558.]



PART 1. General Provisions [3400. - 3418.]



  CHAPTER 1. Preliminary Matters [3400. - 3402.]

3400.

This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the Golden State Energy Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3401.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The safe, efficient, and reliable generation, procurement, transmission, distribution, and storage of energy for residents and businesses in California is essential for living and doing business in California. The economic strength and productivity of California and its residents require the availability of energy with which to operate their businesses and live safely in their homes.

(2) Californians residing, working, or doing business within Pacific Gas and Electric Company’s service territory deserve to be served by a utility that
 prioritizes operational safety and efficiency, is prudently managed and soundly financed, and has a capital structure that enables it to make critical safety investments.

(3) The Legislature recognizes that Pacific Gas and Electric Company may meet the requirements of Chapter 79 of the Statutes of 2019 and emerge from bankruptcy as a transformed utility that is positioned to provide Californians with access to safe, reliable, and affordable service.

(4) The purpose of this division is to ensure that if Pacific Gas and Electric Company fails to emerge from bankruptcy as a transformed utility, then Golden State Energy is duly empowered to serve in that critical role.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that Golden State Energy
 act pursuant to this division only in the event that a transformed utility does not emerge from the bankruptcy or the transformed utility fails to meet its duty to provide safe, reliable, and affordable energy services.

(c) A failure of Pacific Gas and Electric Company to exit bankruptcy will result in a risk to or delay of fair compensation to the victims that have already been waiting years to put their lives back together. It is therefore the intent of the Legislature that, should Pacific Gas and Electric Company not exit its bankruptcy, Golden State Energy be positioned to take over the utility and compensate victims. 

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission regulate Golden State Energy as an electrical and gas corporation, except that the
 commission should recognize its status as a nonprofit public benefit corporation, which does not have shareholders and operates for its customers and for the benefit of the people of California. Due to this difference, it is necessary to establish some alternative procedures for Golden State Energy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3402.

It is the intent of the Legislature that all of the following occur if Golden State Energy commences energy operations:

(a) The operation of Golden State Energy, as the successor to Pacific Gas and Electric Company, will be for the benefit of its customers and will lessen the burdens on the State of California. The purpose of any acquisition of Pacific Gas and Electric Company’s property, including franchise rights and stock, pursuant to this division is to provide more reliable energy services with greater attention on public safety.

(b) Golden State Energy should take into account rate impacts on all customer classes and
 manage its operations to benefit customers throughout its entire service territory.

(c) Golden State Energy should manage its operations to best benefit the public that it serves, demonstrating leadership in the delivery of safe, reliable, clean, affordable energy.

(d) Golden State Energy should adopt procedures to encourage the election of board members who collectively reflect attributes, expertise, and experience relevant to the operation of a safe and reliable utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [3410. - 3418.]

3410.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3411.

“Act” means the Golden State Energy Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3411.5.

“Acquisition of Pacific Gas and Electric Company” means the acquisition of the property, as defined in Section 1235.170 of the Code of Civil Procedure, including any franchise rights and stock, of Pacific Gas and Electric Company, including by eminent domain.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3412.

“Board” means Golden State Energy’s board of directors described in Part 2 (commencing with Section 3420).

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3412.5.

“Decision 20-05-053” means Decision 20-05-053 (May 28, 2019) Decision Approving Reorganization Plan in Investigation 19-09-016 (September 26, 2019) Order Instituting Investigation on the Commission’s Own Motion to Consider the Ratemaking and Other Implications of a Proposed Plan for Resolution of Voluntary Case filed by Pacific Gas and Electric Company Pursuant to Chapter 11 of the Bankruptcy Code, in the United States Bankruptcy Court, Northern District of California, San Francisco Division, In re Pacific Gas and Electric Corporation and Pacific Gas and Electric Company, Case No. 19-30088.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3415.

“Indebtedness” means bonds, notes, commercial paper, variable rate and variable maturity securities, other obligations, and any other evidences of indebtedness issued by Golden State Energy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3416.

“Pacific Gas and Electric Company” means Pacific Gas and Electric Company, PG&E Corporation, any subsidiary or affiliate of the foregoing holding any assets related to the provision of electrical or gas service within Pacific Gas and Electric Company’s service territory, and any successor to any of the foregoing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3417.

“Pacific Gas and Electric Company’s service territory” means the boundaries and specifications of the company’s service territory on the date of the closing of the acquisition of Pacific Gas and Electric Company.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3418.

“Wildfire Fund” means the Wildfire Fund created pursuant to Section 3284.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. Golden State Energy Board Governance [3420. - 3420.]

3420.

(a) The Governor, or the Governor’s designee, may incorporate Golden State Energy as a nonprofit public benefit corporation pursuant to the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code) for the purpose of owning, controlling, operating, or managing electrical and gas services for its ratepayers and for the benefit of all Californians.

(b) (1) Golden State Energy’s initial board of directors shall consist of nine members.

(2) (A) The initial board members shall be appointed as follows: five members
 appointed by the Governor, two members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and two members appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(B) Of the initial board members, one appointee from each of the appointing authorities shall initially serve a two-year term, three appointees by the Governor shall initially serve four-year terms, and one appointee from each of the appointing authorities shall initially serve a six-year term.

(3) (A) The initial board of directors shall amend Golden State Energy’s bylaws to include procedures for the transition to a board consisting of three appointed members, with one member appointed by each of the appointing authorities specified in paragraph (2), who shall serve four-year terms, and six members elected by Golden
 State Energy’s customers, who shall serve a maximum of six-year terms. The procedures for the transition shall provide for the following:

(i) The initial board members serving the two-year term shall be replaced by elected members.

(ii) The initial board members serving the four-year term shall be replaced by elected members.

(iii) The initial board members serving the six-year term shall be replaced by appointed members, with one member appointed by each of the appointing authorities. The appointing authority may reappoint a board member whose term has expired.

(B) Election procedures adopted by the initial board shall include all of the following:

(i) Nomination of members for election to the board shall be based on a matrix of skills, including the following expertise and experience:

(I) Wildfire safety, preparedness, prevention, mitigation, response, or recovery.

(II) Workforce safety and safety culture.

(III) Nuclear generation safety.

(IV) Leadership in the energy or utility industry.

(V) Utility operations and engineering.

(VI) Innovation and technology in renewable energy.

(VII) Risk management, including enterprise risk management.

(VIII) Climate change mitigation or climate resilience.

(IX) Financial performance and planning.

(X) Legal, regulatory, or government experience related to utilities.

(XI) Audit.

(XII) Corporate governance or executive compensation.

(XIII) Labor relations.

(XIV) Large-scale customer experience.

(XV) Utility board experience.

(ii) Measures to maximize board member diversity and the selection of California residents located in the service territory of Golden State Energy.

(iii) Selection by the board, or a committee of the board, of a slate of candidates for election that shall include no less than two candidates for each open board seat using search firms to identify, evaluate, and recommend the most qualified candidates for election.

(iv) Incorporation of stakeholder input into the board selection process.

(C) All elected or appointed members of the board, including those appointed pursuant to paragraph (2), shall be free of conflicts of interest that violate state law or the
 by-laws of Golden State Energy, and shall have demonstrated expertise or experience in one or more of the areas listed in subclauses (I) to (XV), inclusive, of clause (i) of subparagraph (B).

(4) The initial board of directors shall amend Golden State Energy’s bylaws to include provisions that do all of the following:

(A) Ensure that the purposes and functions of Golden State Energy are consistent with the purposes and functions of nonprofit, public benefit corporations in the state, including duties of care and conflict-of-interest standards for officers and board members of a corporation.

(B) Maintain open meeting standards and meeting notice requirements consistent with the general policies of the Bagley-Keene
 Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and affording the public the greatest possible access, consistent with other duties of the corporation.

(C) Provide public access to corporate records consistent with the general policies of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and affording the public the greatest possible access, consistent with the other duties of the corporation.

(5) Upon the adoption or amendment of Golden State Energy’s bylaws, the board shall submit the adopted or amended bylaws to the Governor, the Legislature, and the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 144.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. Golden State Energy Regulation and Oversight [3430. - 3435.]

3430.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code) shall apply to Golden State Energy, and Golden State Energy shall have all the powers of a nonprofit public benefit corporation formed pursuant to that part.

(b) Golden State Energy is an electrical corporation and gas corporation subject to all statutory provisions and the regulatory authority of the commission applicable to electrical or gas corporations, except as otherwise provided in this division.

(c) Insofar
 as this division is inconsistent with any other law, including the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), this division shall prevail.

(d) Insofar as there is overlap in the application of oversight authority over Golden State Energy, including between the commission and the Attorney General, the commission’s authority shall prevail.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3432.

(a) Golden State Energy shall be exempt from the Attorney General’s supervisory authority described in each of the following provisions:

(1) Paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 5142 of the Corporations Code.

(2) Section 5250 of the Corporations Code.

(3) Section 5813.5 of the Corporations Code.

(4) Section 5913 of the Corporations Code.

(5) Section 6010 of the Corporations Code.

(6) Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 6510) of Part 2 of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code. 

(7) Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 6610) of Part 2 of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(8) The Supervision of Trustees and Fundraisers for Charitable Purposes Act (Article 7 (commencing with Section 12580) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(b) Golden State Energy shall not be required to give notice to the Attorney General pursuant to the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3433.

A person who, pursuant to a specific provision of Golden State Energy’s articles or bylaws, has the right to vote for the election of a director, on a disposition of all or substantially all of the assets of a corporation, on a merger, or on a dissolution, shall not be a member of Golden State Energy for purposes of the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), unless the articles or bylaws designate the person as a member.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3434.

(a) In addition to the purposes described in Section 817, Golden State Energy may issue debt to facilitate the acquisition of Pacific Gas and Electric Company consistent with this section.

(b) Golden State Energy may provide a rate covenant to all of its debt holders, including holders of debt issued to facilitate the acquisition of Pacific Gas and Electric Company.

(c) Before issuing debt pursuant to this section, Golden State Energy shall submit an application to the commission for the authority to do so pursuant to Section 818. Notwithstanding Section 819, with respect to debt issued to facilitate the
 acquisition of Pacific Gas and Electric Company, the commission shall issue an order resolving the application within 100 days of the application’s submittal. Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 311 and any other law, with respect to debt issued to facilitate the acquisition of Pacific Gas and Electric Company, the commission may issue an order resolving the application not sooner than 15 days following the filing and service of the proposed decision by the assigned commissioner or the administrative law judge or the filing of any alternate decision pursuant to Section 311.

(d) Pursuant to the rate covenant, in each general rate case or attrition year adjustment application, Golden State Energy shall apply for a revenue requirement sufficient to do all of the following:

(1) Pay
 for operations and maintenance costs, and administrative and general expenses.

(2) Service debt and satisfy any debt service coverage margin associated with the rate covenant’s requirements for debt, or for the refinancing of that debt, (A) issued to fund the formation of Golden State Energy and to acquire Pacific Gas and Electric Company, (B) issued by Golden State Energy between the acquisition of Pacific Gas and Electric Company and the approval of Golden State Energy’s first general rate case application, and (C) approved by the commission pursuant to a general rate case application filed by Golden State Energy, including for compliance with the regulatory requirements described in subdivision (f).

(3) Pay the costs of commission approved capital expenditures not funded from
 debt.

(4) Fund and maintain necessary financial and operating reserves.

(e) Concurrent with each general rate case or attrition year
 application, Golden State Energy shall file with the commission a debt issuance and retirement forecast summarizing the prospective estimated necessary debt issuance and estimated debt repayment during the term of the general rate case and the additional revenue requirement necessary to meet the rate covenant’s requirements taking into account any additional debt issuance and repayment.

(f) In each Golden State Energy general rate case or attrition year adjustment, the commission shall do both of the following:

(1) Consider, modify if necessary, and adopt a revenue requirement adequate to furnish and maintain efficient, just and reasonable service, instrumentalities, equipment, and facilities to promote the safety, health, comfort, and convenience of its customers,
 employees, and the public. The commission shall only approve just and reasonable rates; however, in no event shall the commission set the revenue requirement below the amount necessary to satisfy the rate covenant’s requirements.

(2) Authorize Golden State Energy to issue debt as necessary to maintain and operate its assets consistent with the revenue requirement approved by the commission for the applicable period of the general rate case.

(g) (1) No later than 45 days after (A) the earliest occurrence of a material bankruptcy event described in paragraph (2), (B) the commission determines that Pacific Gas and Electric Company’s certificate of public convenience and necessity for the provision of electrical or gas service should be revoked pursuant to any
 processes or procedures adopted by the commission in its Decision 20-05-053, or (C) the initiation by Pacific Gas and Electric Company of a sale process for its assets or stock, the commission shall initiate a proceeding to modify the rules and processes that apply to Pacific Gas and Electric Company as necessary to reflect the differences in Golden State Energy’s capital structure to ensure continued regulation of rates, electrical and gas safety, wildfire mitigation, climate change mitigation and adaption, public purpose programs, and any other commission requirements applicable to an electrical corporation or gas corporation.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, each of the following is a material bankruptcy event:

(A) Termination of “Tort Claimants
 Committee Restructuring Support Agreement” (as amended) (Case 19-30088; Document No. 5143-1 (entered December 16, 2019)).

(B) Termination of “Noteholder Restructuring Support Agreement” (Case 19-30088; Document No. 5519-1 (entered January 27, 2020)).

(C) Denial of confirmation of “Debtors’ and Shareholder Proponents’ Joint Chapter 11 Plan of Reorganization Dated March 16, 2020” (Case 19-30088; Document No. 6320 (entered March 16, 2020)).

(D) Failure to confirm on or before June 30, 2020, a plan for Pacific Gas and Electric Company to exit bankruptcy.

(E) Failure of the confirmed plan for Pacific Gas and Electric Company to exit bankruptcy to
 become effective on or before September 30, 2020.

(F) The termination of plan proposal’s exclusivity period for any party other than the debtors.

(G) The filing of a plan for Pacific Gas and Electric Company to exit bankruptcy by any party other than the debtors.

(H) The appointment of a trustee, conversion to a case under
 Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 701) of the United State Bankruptcy Code (Title 11 of the United States Code), or dismissal of the bankruptcy cases.

(h) (1) Following the closing of the acquisition of Pacific Gas and Electric Company by Golden State Energy, the general rate case revenue requirement in effect for Pacific Gas and Electric Company on the date of the closing of the acquisition shall remain in effect until the revenue requirement is modified pursuant to this section.

(2) The test year for the initial general rate case proceeding for Golden State Energy shall occur no sooner than three years from the date of the closing of the acquisition of Pacific Gas and Electric Company.

(3) During the interim period between the closing of the acquisition of Pacific Gas and Electric Company and the
 commission’s adoption of a new general rate case revenue requirement in a general rate case proceeding pursuant to paragraph (2), both of the following may occur. 

(A) The commission shall direct Golden State Energy to file for attrition year adjustment of the existing revenue requirement.

(B) Golden State Energy may make interim modifications to the existing revenue requirement to satisfy the rate covenant, including factoring in capital expenses, debt issuances, operation and maintenance of the utility, funding reserves, and working capital needs and collection of amounts recorded in balancing accounts after the date of the acquisition of Pacific Gas and Electric by Golden State Energy. Any interim modifications to the revenue requirement shall be
 subject to approval of and prospective modification by the commission consistent with subdivision (f). Golden State Energy shall file an application for review of any interim modifications to its revenue requirement concurrently with the implementation of such modification.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3435.

Until Golden State Energy adopts a plan to address organizational and governing issues related to safety that is approved by the commission, upon the acquisition of Pacific Gas and Electric Company, Golden State Energy shall comply with provisions set forth in Decision 20-05-053 related to all of the following:

(a) The establishment of an executive-level Chief Risk Officer and an executive-level Chief Safety Officer.

(b) The appointment of an independent safety adviser.

(c) The appointment of regional executive officers to manage specified regions of the service
 territory of Golden State Energy.

(d) The continuation of the safety and nuclear oversight committees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. GOLDEN STATE ENERGY FINANCING POWER [3440. - 3446.]

3440.

(a) Golden State Energy shall be exempt from franchise and corporate income tax pursuant to Section 23701 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. Indebtedness issued by Golden State Energy and any transfer thereof shall be exempt from income taxation of every kind by the state.

(b) Property used exclusively by Golden State Energy in carrying out its purposes in Section 3402 shall not be exempt from taxation under subdivision (b) of Section 4 of, and Section 5 of, Article XIII of the California Constitution and Section 214 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3442.
